Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4102.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 468.073 is amended to read:
468.073. (1)(a) [The Department of Environmental Quality may enter into an agreement with] Any
applicant, permittee or regulated entity may enter into an agreement with the Department of
Environmental Quality setting a schedule of payments to the department for the purpose of ena-
bling the department to expedite or enhance a regulatory process by contracting for services, hiring
additional staff or covering costs of activities not otherwise provided during the ordinary course of
department business. The department may expend moneys received under the agreements for:
[(a)] (A) Activities undertaken by the department under authority of any provision of ORS
chapters 448, 453, 454, 459, 459A, 465, 466, 467, 468, 468A and 468B and ORS 475.405 to 475.495.
[(b)] (B) Administering and reviewing activities [described under subsection (3) of this section that
are] performed by a third party pursuant to this section.
(C) Hiring additional staff, including limited duration employees, for the purpose of ex-
pediting or enhancing the regulatory process.
(b) Before hiring additional staff or contracting with a third party to provide services
pursuant to this section, the department shall evaluate opportunities to perform the services
with existing staff.
(2)(a) An applicant, permittee or regulated entity may request that the department enter
into an agreement described in subsection (1) of this section. The request must include:
(A) A complete description of each permit, authorization or other regulatory determi-
nation for which the agreement is being requested;
(B) A statement of need that includes an explanation of why the expedited or enhanced
regulatory process is in the public interest; and
(C) A demonstration that the requester has secured any land use permit, authorization
or other approval necessary for the project for which an agreement under subsection (1) of
this section is being sought.
(b) The department shall evaluate whether the expedited or enhanced regulatory process
is in the public interest by considering:
(A) Project readiness; and
Enrolled House Bill 4102 (HB 4102-INTRO) Page 1

(B) The number of department regulatory activities that are outstanding and the impact
on those activities from an agreement for the expedited or enhanced regulatory process.
(3)(a) No later than 45 business days after receiving a written request to enter into an
agreement under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify the requester in
writing that:
(A) The request is granted; or
(B) The request is denied based on the department’s consideration of the factors de-
scribed in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(b) Notices provided to requesters under this subsection must include a description of the
department’s consideration of the factors described in subsection (2)(b) of this section. A
requester may submit a request for reconsideration of a notice provided under paragraph
(a)(B) of this subsection to the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality. The
director’s decision on a request for reconsideration is not subject to judicial review under
ORS chapter 183.
(4)(a) The department shall make available on the department’s website:
(A) Agreements entered into under subsection (1) of this section;
(B) Notices provided to applicants under subsection (3) of this section; and
(C) A list of third parties hired or contracted with by the department and a description
of the services rendered.
(b) Information made available by the department under this subsection must be
redacted to exclude any trade secrets, as defined in ORS 646.461, or other confidential busi-
ness information.
(5) The department may not waive any of the department’s authority or obligations under
any provision of ORS chapters 448, 453, 454, 459, 459A, 465, 466, 467, 468, 468A and 468B and
ORS 475.405 to 475.495 or rules adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission by enter-
ing into an agreement under subsection (1) of this section. Except as provided in subsection
(6) of this section, the department may not waive or alter any obligation or requirement of
an applicant, permittee or regulated entity under any provision of ORS chapters 448, 453, 454,
459, 459A, 465, 466, 467, 468, 468A and 468B and ORS 475.405 to 475.495 or any rule adopted
by the commission by entering into an agreement under subsection (1) of this section.
[(2)] (6) Payments agreed to under subsection (1) of this section shall be for services voluntarily
requested by the applicant, permittee or regulated entity. As part of the agreement, the department
may waive all or part of any fee otherwise imposed for those services. The department shall not
alter or establish processing priorities or schedules based upon an expectation of entering into an
agreement under subsection (1) of this section.
[(3) Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall identify department activities or portions
thereof suitable for contracting out to third parties. Failure of the department to identify a specific ac-
tivity shall not prevent the expenditure of funds for that activity or for department administration and
review of that activity under an agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.]
[(4)] (7) Any moneys received by the department under an agreement described under subsection
(1) of this section shall not exceed the cost to the department of providing the service to the appli-
cant, permittee or regulated entity.
[(5)] (8) Any payments received under an agreement described under [subsections (1) to (4)]
subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of an account
of the Department of Environmental Quality and are continuously appropriated for the purposes
specified in the individual agreements.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the department shall, in a timely
manner, enter into an agreement under subsection (1) of this section with an applicant,
permittee or regulated entity if:
(a) The applicant has submitted a complete application for a permit, authorization or
other regulatory determination with all information necessary for the department to take
action;
Enrolled House Bill 4102 (HB 4102-INTRO) Page 2

(b) Qualified and appropriate third-party contractors are available;
(c) At least one year has passed since the department denied a request by the applicant,
permittee or regulated entity to enter into an agreement under subsection (1) of this section;
and
(d) The regulatory process for which the applicant, permittee or regulated entity sought
to enter into an agreement has not been substantially completed.
(10) Upon completion of the work conducted by a third party, the department shall ex-
pedite commencement of any relevant public process requirements and take action on the
application for the permit, authorization or other regulatory determination.
SECTION 2. (1) The amendments to ORS 468.073 by section 1 of this 2026 Act become
operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality may take any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the department to
exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by the amendments to ORS 468.073
by section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 10, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4102 (HB 4102-INTRO) Page 3